Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-134
Advisory committees or councils; members; appointment; no compensation; expenses; meetings.

The Governor may establish special or general advisory committees or councils to the Governor's Policy Research Office and appoint the members thereof, who shall serve for stated times or at his or her pleasure. Members shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for the necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees. The Governor may designate the chairperson and such other officers as he or she may deem necessary for each advisory committee or council. Advisory committees or councils established pursuant to the provisions of this section shall meet at the call of their chairperson or of the Director of Policy Research.

Laws 1969, c. 775, § 4, p. 2939;

Laws 1979, LB 412, § 14;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 210.